Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 152.1 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created within the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation (OSBI) a Cyber Crime and Fraud Unit. The Unit shall
Req. No. 16580 Page 1

oper ate as an internal division of the Bureau and shall exercise
only those investigative powers and jurisdiction already granted to
the OSBI under existing Oklahoma law.
B. The purpose of the Cyber Crime and Fraud Unit shall be to
enhance the capacity of the Bureau to investigate:
1. Cyber-enabled criminal activity, including intrusions,
network breaches, ransomware digital extortion, and online
exploitation;
2. Financial fraud and related schemes, including cyber-
facilitated fraud, identity theft, and complex financial deception;
and
3. Criminal activity involving digital evidence, consistent
with the existing statutory authority of the Bureau.
C. Nothing in this act shall be construed to expand or modify
the jurisdiction of the OSBI. The Unit may only initiate or conduct
investigations:
1. Upon request or referral from a district attorney, law
enforcement agency, or state officer authorized under existing law;
2. Upon direction of the Governor, consistent with current
statutory authority; or
3. As otherwise permitted under existing OSBI jurisdictional
statutes.


Req. No. 16580 Page 2

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 152.1a of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Cyber Crime and Fraud Unit shall, within the existing
jurisdiction of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation:
1. Conduct investigations involving cyber-crime, digital
evidence, and fraud-related offenses;
2. Provide digital forensics, technical assistance, and
analytical support to OSBI agents and requesting agencies;
3. Coordinate with federal, state, tribal, and local partners
on cyber and fraud investigations;
4. Develop and deliver training to law enforcement agencies on
cyber-crime trends, digital evidence handling, and fraud prevention;
and
5. Maintain specialized personnel, including agents, analysts,
forensic examiners, and technical support staff.
B. The OSBI Director may assign personnel, reallocate
resources, and establish internal procedures necessary to carry out
the responsibilities of the Unit.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 152.1b of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby appropriated, subject to available funding,
one time to the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, from monies
Req. No. 16580 Page 3

not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the
State Treasury, the sum of Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) for
the purpose of establishing and operating the Cyber Crime and Fraud
Unit.
B. The funds appropriated in subsection A of this section shall
be used for:
1. Personnel costs, including agents, analysts, forensic
examiners, and support staff;
2. Technology, digital forensics equipment, and investigative
tools;
3. Training, certifications, and professional development; and
4. Operational expenses necessary to support cyber-crime and
fraud investigations.
C. Any unexpended funds shall be carried forward and used for
the same purpose.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 152.1c of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation to be designated the
"Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation Cyber Crime and Fraud Unit
Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies
appropriated by the Legislature, or received by the Oklahoma State
Req. No. 16580 Page 4

Bure au of Investigation, designated for the fund. All monies
accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may
be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation for the purpose of theft and fraud enforcement,
prevention, public information, education initiatives, and the
creation of the Cyber Crime and Fraud Unit. Expenditures from said
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 152.1d of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation is authorized to
promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this act
provided that such rules do not expand the jurisdiction of the
Bureau beyond that established in existing law.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16580 GRS 02/19/26




Req. No. 16580 Page 5